Rhode Island, session 2025, SB458.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 45-19.1-3 and 45-19.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-19.1
entitled "Cancer Benefits for Fire Fighters" are hereby amended to read as follows:
45-19.1-3. Occupational cancer disability for fire fighters.
(a) Any fire fighter, including one employed by the state, or a municipal fire fighter
employed by a municipality that participates in the optional retirement for police officers and fire
fighters, as provided in chapter 21.2 of this title, who is unable to perform his or her duties in the
fire department by reason of a disabling occupational cancer which develops or manifests itself
during a period while the fire fighter is in the service of the department, and any retired member of
the fire department of any city or town who develops occupational cancer, is entitled to receive an
occupational cancer disability, and he or she is entitled to all of the benefits provided for in chapters
19, 21 and 21.2 of this title and chapter 10 of title 36 if the fire fighter is employed by the state.
(b) The provisions of this section apply retroactively in the case of any retired member of
the fire department of any city or town.
(c) The provisions of this section shall apply to all fire fighters employed by any
municipality notwithstanding contrary provisions of any special statute or public law pertaining to
municipal pension benefits, any municipal charter, and/or any municipal ordinance.
45-19.1-4. Conclusive presumption.
(a) Any type of cancer found in a firefighter is conclusively presumed to be an occupational
cancer as that term is defined in § 45-19.1-2.

(b) This conclusive presumption shall not apply to firefighters hired after July 22, 2020, in
the following situations:
(1) If a physical examination was conducted at the time the firefighter was hired and the
examination revealed that person had cancer; or
(2) If the firefighter has completed less than two (2) years of employment with his or her
fire department; or
(3) If the firefighter has regularly or habitually used tobacco products during the five (5)
years prior to any diagnosis of cancer.
(c) The provisions of this section shall apply retroactively to all cancer-related illnesses,
injuries, and disability claims pending on or after July 22, 2020.
(d) The provisions of this section shall apply to all firefighters employed by any
municipality notwithstanding contrary provisions of any special statute or public law pertaining to
municipal pension benefits, any municipal charter, and/or any municipal ordinance.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001786/SUB A
========
LC001786/SUB A - Page 2 of 3